Illinois, session 104th, HB2045.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-126 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-126)7    Sec. 6z-126. Law Enforcement Training Fund. 8    (a) The Law Enforcement Training Fund is hereby created as 9a special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall 10consist of: (i) the share of the revenue from increasing the 11insurance producer license fees allocated for transfer to the 12Fund as provided under subsection (a-5) of Section 500-135 of 13the Illinois Insurance Code; and (ii) the share of the moneys 14collected from auto insurance policy fees under Section 8.6 of 15the Illinois Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft 16Prevention and Insurance Verification Act allocated for 17deposit into the Fund; and (iii) any moneys received for the 18purposes of item (iv) of subsection (b) of this Section, 19including, but not limited to, fee receipts, gifts, grants, 20and awards from any public or private entity. Any interest 21earned on moneys in the Fund must be deposited into the Fund. 22    (b) This Fund shall be used by the Illinois Law 23Enforcement Training Standards Board for the following   HB2045 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11510 BDA 21599 b1purposes: (i) to fund law enforcement certification 2compliance; (ii) for the development and provision of basic 3courses by Board-approved academics, and in-service courses by 4approved academies; and (iii) for the ordinary and contingent 5expenses of the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards 6Board; and (iv) for the awarding of grants to units of local 7government, public institutions of higher education, and 8qualified nonprofit entities for the purpose of hiring and 9retaining law enforcement officers, county correctional 10officers, and public safety telecommunicators. 11    (c) When awarding grants under this Section, the Board 12shall prioritize: 13        (1) grants that will be used in underserved areas and 14    areas experiencing the most need to hire, retain, or hire 15    and retain law enforcement officers, county correctional 16    officers, and public safety telecommunicators in 17    underserved areas and areas experiencing the most need; 18        (2) achieving demographic and geographic diversity of 19    law enforcement officers that are recruited or hired by 20    applicants that are awarded grants; 21        (3) maximizing the effects of moneys spent on the 22    actual recruitment and retention of law enforcement 23    officers, county correctional officers, and public safety 24    telecommunicators; and 25        (4) providing grants that can impact multiple 26    employers.   HB2045 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11510 BDA 21599 b1    (d) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 2may, by rule, set requirements for the distribution of grant 3moneys and determine which entities are eligible.4    (e) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 5shall consider compliance with the Uniform Crime Reporting Act 6as a factor in awarding grant moneys. 7    (f) As used in this Section, "qualified nonprofit entity" 8means a nonprofit entity, as defined by the Board by rule, that 9has established experience in recruitment and retention of law 10enforcement officers in Illinois. 11(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 12104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.